New York, session 2025-2026, A467.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (e) of subdivision 4 of section 10-c of the high- 2 way law, as amended by section 1 of part A of chapter 58 of the laws of 3 2020, is amended to read as follows: 4 (e) Funds allocated for local street or highway projects under this 5 subdivision shall be used to undertake work on a project either with the 6 municipality's own forces or by contract, provided however, that whenev- 7 er the estimate for the construction contract work exceeds one hundred 8 thousand dollars but does not exceed [three] seven hundred fifty thou- 9 sand dollars such work must be performed either with the municipality's 10 own forces or by contract let by competitive bid in accordance with the 11 provisions of section one hundred three of the general municipal law and 12 provided further, however, that whenever the estimate for the 13 construction contract work exceeds [three] seven hundred fifty thousand 14 dollars such work must be performed by contract let by competitive bid 15 in accordance with the provisions of section one hundred three of the 16 general municipal law. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 18 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01284-01-5